Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this
title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided
in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All
homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as
other real property therein, except that each homestead, as defined
by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all
forms of ad valorem taxation pursuant to Section 1 of Article XII-A
of the Oklahoma Constitution to the extent of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) of the assessed valuation for tax years 1988 through
2026 and Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for tax year 2027 and
subsequent tax years.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1809 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON REVENUE AND TAXATION
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1809 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)